Illinois, session 104th, HB3928.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The amount of $12,242,100, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Executive Ethics Commission for its ordinary and 8contingent expenses. 9    Section 10. The amount of $1,050,100, or so much thereof 10as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund to the 11Executive Ethics Commission for its ordinary and contingent 12expenses. 13    Section 15. The amount of $936,500, or so much thereof as 14may be necessary, is appropriated from the Capital Development 15Board Revolving Fund to the Executive Ethics Commission for 16its ordinary and contingent expenses. 17    Section 20. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much thereof 18as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Professional 19Services Fund to the Executive Ethics Commission for its 20ordinary and contingent expenses.   HB3928- 2 -OMB104 00061 LAH 10061 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 22025.